Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.200

County road budget—Hearing, adoption, supplemental budget.

The board shall hold such hearing at the time and place designated in the notice, and it may be continued from day to day until concluded but not to exceed a total of five days. Upon the conclusion of the hearing the board shall fix and determine the supplemental budget and by resolution adopt it as finally determined and enter it in detail in the official minutes of the board, a copy of which supplemental budget shall be forwarded to the director.

[ 1995 c 301 s 70; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.200. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 6, part; 1943 c 82 s 7, part; 1937 c 187 s 56, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-56, part.]